South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4615.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 11 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 11-1-130.  An entity that hires or employs an individual that is located in the United States with an H-1B or Optional Practical Training (OPT) visa may not receive any state economic development incentives. State economic development incentives include, but are not limited to, job or employee tax credits, general business tax credits, infrastructure credits, property rehabilitation and housing credits, conservation credits, energy conservation and alternative energy credits, sales tax exemptions, property tax exemptions, and fee in lieu of property tax agreements. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect on July 1, 2027. ----XX----